Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,214
Automatic withdrawal upon certain
conversions.

(MBCA
15.21) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state
that converts to a domestic nonprofit corporation or any form of domestic
filing entity shall be deemed to have withdrawn on the effective date of the
conversion.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 214.